Nebraska, session 109, LB585.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB585 LB585
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 43-2404.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
43-2404.02 (1) There is created a separate and distinct budgetary
program within the commission to be known as the Community-based Juvenile
Services Aid Program. Funding acquired from participation in the federal
act, state General Funds, and funding acquired from other sources which
may be used for purposes consistent with the Juvenile Services Act and
the federal act shall be used to aid in the establishment and provision
of community-based services for juveniles who come in contact with the
juvenile justice system.
(2)(a) Ten percent of the annual General Fund appropriation to the
Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program, excluding administrative
budget funds, shall be set aside for the development of a common data set
and evaluation of the effectiveness of the Community-based Juvenile
Services Aid Program. The intent in creating this common data set is to
allow for evaluation of the use of the funds and the effectiveness of the
programs or outcomes in the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid
Program.
(b) The common data set shall be developed and maintained by the
commission and shall serve as a primary data collection site for any
intervention funded by the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program
designed to serve juveniles and deter involvement in the formal juvenile
justice system. The commission shall work with agencies and programs to
enhance existing data sets. To ensure that the data set permits
evaluation of recidivism and other measures, the commission shall work
with the Office of Probation Administration, juvenile diversion programs,
law enforcement, the courts, and others to compile data that demonstrates
whether a youth has moved deeper into the juvenile justice system. The
University of Nebraska at Omaha, Juvenile Justice Institute, shall assist
with the development of common definitions, variables, and training
required for data collection and reporting into the common data set by
-2-

LB585 LB585
2025 2025
juvenile justice programs. The common data set maintained by the
commission shall be provided to the University of Nebraska at Omaha,
Juvenile Justice Institute, to assess the effectiveness of the Community-
based Juvenile Services Aid Program.
(c) Providing the commission access to records and information for,
as well as the commission granting access to records and information
from, the common data set is not a violation of confidentiality
provisions under any law, rule, or regulation if done in good faith for
purposes of evaluation. Records and documents, regardless of physical
form, that are obtained or produced or presented to the commission for
the common data set are not public records for purposes of sections
84-712 to 84-712.09.
(d) Pursuant to subdivision (a) of this subsection, such (d) The ten
percent of the annual General Fund appropriation to the Community-based
Juvenile Services Aid Program, excluding administrative budget funds,
shall be appropriated as follows: In fiscal year 2015-16, seven percent
shall go to the commission for development of the common data set and
three percent shall go to the University of Nebraska at Omaha, Juvenile
Justice Institute, for evaluation. In fiscal year 2016-17, six percent
shall go to the commission for development and maintenance of the common
data set and four percent shall go to the University of Nebraska at
Omaha, Juvenile Justice Institute, for evaluation. Every fiscal year
thereafter, beginning in fiscal year 2017-18, five percent shall go to
the commission for development and maintenance of the common data set and
five percent shall go to the University of Nebraska at Omaha, Juvenile
Justice Institute, for evaluation.
(e) Ten percent of the annual General Fund appropriation to the
Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program, excluding administrative
budget funds, shall be set aside for grants to community-based
organizations that are located in qualified census tracts as defined in
26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on January 1, 2025,
-3-

LB585 LB585
2025 2025
that have a budget of no more than one million dollars annually, and that
are designed to prevent juvenile crime prior to involvement with the
criminal justice system.
(f) (e) The remaining funds in the annual General Fund appropriation
to the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program shall be apportioned
as aid in accordance with a formula established in rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated by the commission. The formula shall be based on
the total number of residents per county and federally recognized or
state-recognized Indian tribe who are twelve years of age through
eighteen years of age and who come into contact with the juvenile justice
system other relevant factors as determined by the commission. The
commission may require a local match of up to five forty percent from the
county, multiple counties, federally recognized or state-recognized
Indian tribe or tribes, or any combination of the three which is
receiving aid under such program. Any local expenditures for community-
based programs for juveniles may be applied toward such match
requirement.
(3)(a) In distributing funds provided under the Community-based
Juvenile Services Aid Program, aid recipients shall prioritize programs
and services that will divert juveniles from the juvenile justice system,
reduce the population of juveniles in juvenile detention and secure
confinement, and assist in transitioning juveniles from out-of-home
placements. The process for distribution of funds shall consider criteria
including (i) staff with lived experience with the juvenile justice
system, (ii) the organization's budget size, (iii) the location of the
program in a qualified census tract as defined in 26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)
(ii)(I), as such section existed on January 1, 2025, and (iv) the
demographics of the population served.
(b) Funds received under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid
Program shall be used exclusively to assist the aid recipient in the
implementation and operation of programs or the provision of services
-4-

LB585 LB585
2025 2025
identified in the aid recipient's comprehensive juvenile services plan,
including programs for local planning and service coordination;
screening, assessment, and evaluation; diversion; alternatives to
detention; family support services; treatment services; truancy
prevention and intervention programs; pilot projects approved by the
commission; payment of transportation costs to and from placements,
evaluations, or services; personnel when the personnel are aligned with
evidence-based treatment principles, programs, or practices; contracting
with other state agencies or private organizations that provide evidence-
based treatment or programs; preexisting programs that are aligned with
evidence-based practices or best practices; and other services that will
positively impact juveniles and families in the juvenile justice system.
(c) Funds received under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid
Program may be used one time by an aid recipient:
(i) To convert an existing juvenile detention facility or other
existing structure for use as an alternative to detention as defined in
section 43-245;
(ii) To invest in capital construction, including both new
construction and renovations, for a facility for use as an alternative to
detention; or
(iii) For the initial lease of a facility for use as an alternative
to detention.
(d) Funds received under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid
Program shall not be used for the following:
(i) Construction of secure detention facilities, secure youth
treatment facilities, or secure youth confinement facilities;
(ii) Capital construction or the lease or acquisition of facilities
beyond the one-time use described in subdivision (3)(c) of this section;
(iii) Programs, services, treatments, evaluations, or other
preadjudication services that are not based on or grounded in evidence-
based practices, principles, and research, except that the commission may
-5-

LB585 LB585
2025 2025
approve pilot projects that authorize the use of such aid; or
(iv) Office equipment, office supplies, or office space that does
not support program implementation.
(e) Any aid not distributed to counties under this subsection shall
be retained by the commission to be distributed on a competitive basis
under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program for a county,
multiple counties, federally recognized or state-recognized Indian tribe
or tribes, or any combination of the three, or community-based
organizations, demonstrating additional need in the funding areas
identified in this subsection.
(f) If a county, multiple counties, or a federally recognized or
state-recognized Indian tribe or tribes, or a community-based
organization is denied aid under this section or receives no aid under
this section, the entity may request an appeal pursuant to the appeal
process in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
commission. The commission shall establish appeal and hearing procedures
by December 15, 2025 2014. The commission shall make appeal and hearing
procedures available on its website.
(4)(a) Any recipient of aid under the Community-based Juvenile
Services Aid Program shall electronically file an annual report as
required by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
commission. Any program funded through the Community-based Juvenile
Services Aid Program that served juveniles shall report data on the
individual youth served. Any program that is not directly serving youth
shall include program-level data. In either case, data collected shall
include, but not be limited to, the following: The type of juvenile
service, how the service met the goals of the comprehensive juvenile
services plan, demographic information on the juveniles served, program
outcomes, the total number of juveniles served, and the number of
juveniles who completed the program or intervention.
(b) Any recipient of aid under the Community-based Juvenile Services
-6-

LB585 LB585
2025 2025
Aid Program shall be assisted by the University of Nebraska at Omaha,
Juvenile Justice Institute, in reporting in the common data set, as set
forth in the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
commission. Community-based aid utilization and evaluation data shall be
stored and maintained by the commission.
(c) Evaluation of the use of funds and the evidence of the
effectiveness of the programs shall be completed by the University of
Nebraska at Omaha, Juvenile Justice Institute, specifically:
(i) The varying rates of recidivism, as defined by rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission, and other measures
for juveniles participating in community-based programs; and
(ii) Whether juveniles are sent to staff secure or secure juvenile
detention after participating in a program funded by the Community-based
Juvenile Services Aid Program.
(d) The University of Nebraska at Omaha, Juvenile Justice Institute,
shall assist community-based organizations receiving funds pursuant to
this section to create logic models and develop evaluation measurements
to assess program impact.
(5) The commission shall report annually to the Governor and the
Legislature on the distribution and use of funds for aid appropriated
under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program. The report shall
include, but not be limited to, an aggregate report of the use of the
Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program funds, including the types
of juvenile services and programs that were funded, whether any
recipients used the funds for a purpose described in subdivision (3)(c)
of this section, demographic information on the total number of juveniles
served, program success rates, the total number of juveniles sent to
secure juvenile detention or residential treatment and secure
confinement, and a listing of the expenditures of all counties and
federally recognized or state-recognized Indian tribes for detention,
residential treatment, and secure confinement. The report submitted to
-7-

LB585 LB585
2025 2025
the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.
(6) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
for the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program in consultation
with the Director of the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program,
the Director of Juvenile Diversion Programs, the Office of Probation
Administration, the Nebraska Association of County Officials, and the
University of Nebraska at Omaha, Juvenile Justice Institute. The rules
and regulations shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) The required elements of a comprehensive juvenile services plan
and planning process;
(b) The Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program formula,
review process, match requirements, and fund distribution. The
distribution process shall ensure a conflict of interest policy;
(c) A distribution process for funds retained under subsection (3)
of this section;
(d) A plan for evaluating the effectiveness of plans and programs
receiving funding;
(e) A reporting process for aid recipients;
(f) A reporting process for the commission to the Governor and
Legislature. The report shall be made electronically to the Governor and
the Legislature; and
(g) Requirements regarding the use of the common data set.
Sec. 2. Original section 43-2404.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-8-